Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2901
Hospitals; mutual insurance association; how incorporated; purpose.

Any three or more hospitals as defined in section 71-419, which are located in this state and licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services, may incorporate a mutual insurance association to insure member hospitals and their officers, directors, employees, and volunteer workers against liability arising from rendering, or failing to render, professional services in the treatment or care of patients by hospitals and their agents and employees or by member physicians.

Laws 1976, LB 809, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 243;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 182.